Utah statutes.
58-41-17.   Testing period for hearing aids.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Hearing aid" means any wearable instrument or device designed or offered for the purpose of aiding or compensating for impaired human hearing and any parts, attachments, or accessories thereto.

(b)  "Hearing aid" does not include any type of device which is surgically implanted in the cochlea or under the skin near the ear.

(2)  Any person licensed under this chapter who sells a hearing aid to a consumer shall provide a written receipt or written contract to the consumer.  The written receipt or contract shall provide the consumer with a 30-day right to cancel the purchase if the consumer finds that the hearing aid does not function adequately for the consumer and to obtain a refund if the consumer returns the hearing aid to the seller in the same condition, ordinary wear and tear excluded, as when purchased.  The written receipt or contract shall notify the consumer of the 30-day right to cancel in at least 10 point type.  The 30-day right to cancel shall commence from either the date the hearing aid is originally delivered to the consumer or the date the written receipt or contract is delivered to the consumer, whichever is later.  The 30-day period shall be tolled for any period during which the hearing aid seller, dealer, or fitter has possession or control of the hearing aid after its original delivery.

(3)  Upon exercise of the 30-day right to cancel a hearing aid purchase, the seller of the hearing aid is entitled to a cancellation fee equal to the actual cost that will be incurred by the seller in order to return the hearing aid to the manufacturer, provided that the written receipt or contract states the exact amount that will be retained by the seller as a cancellation fee.

